Hawaii statutes.
[§412:2-100.5] Powers of the commissioner.
In addition to any other powers provided by law, the commissioner shall have
the authority to:

(1) Administer and enforce the provisions and
requirements of this chapter;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules or issue
declaratory rulings pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter;

(3) Issue informal nonbinding interpretations to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(4) Develop requirements for charter or licensure
through rules;

(5) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter or any rule or order of, or agreement with, the
commissioner; and

(6) Require a licensed or chartered entity or other
entity with a certificate of authority to comply with any rule, guidance,
guideline, statement, supervisory policy, or any similar proclamation issued or
adopted by the appropriate federal regulatory authority. [L 2013, c 172, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next